North Carolina statutes. Chapter 147. State Officers.
Article 6. Treasurer.
§ 147-69.6.
Swain County Settlement Trust Fund.

The Swain County Settlement Trust Fund is established as a special fund in the Office of the State Treasurer under the management of the Treasurer. The Treasurer may invest the assets of the Fund in any of the investments authorized under subdivisions (b)(1) through (6) and subdivision (b)(8) of

G.S. 147-69.2

. The Fund shall consist of the proceeds of any payments made by the United States in settlement of the 1943 agreement between Swain County and the United States Department of Interior, such other contributions as Swain County or other entities may choose to make to the Fund, and the interest and other investment income earned by the Fund. For the purposes of this section, the initial balance of the Fund shall be defined as fifty-two million dollars ($52,000,000).

(a1)

Contributions to the Fund are irrevocable. Assets in the Fund may be disbursed only to Swain County.

The State Treasurer shall disburse to Swain County amounts requested by the Swain County Board of Commissioners pursuant to a majority vote of that body, provided that disbursements to Swain County under this subsection shall not be made from the initial balance of the Fund. Disbursements made pursuant to this subsection shall occur no more frequently than once per quarter.

No portion of the initial balance of the Fund may be disbursed to Swain County absent a request by the Swain County Board of Commissioners accompanied by a certification by the Swain County Board of Elections that two-thirds of the registered voters of Swain County voted in favor of the disbursement and subsequent expenditure of the amount requested in a referendum conducted under subsection (f) of this section.

Funds disbursed to Swain County under subsections (b) or (c) of this section shall be managed by the county in accordance with the requirements of the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act, as amended.

No part of the initial balance of the Swain County Settlement Trust Fund or of any interest or other income earned on that initial balance may be paid to or received by any agent or attorney on account of services rendered in connection with negotiating the settlement agreement between Swain County and the United States Department of Interior or obtaining the monetary settlement from the United States.

The Board of Commissioners of Swain County may direct the Swain County Board of Elections to conduct an advisory referendum on the question of whether any portion of the initial balance of the Fund should be disbursed to and expended by the county for a particular purpose. The election shall be held in accordance with the procedures of

G.S. 163-287

. The question to be presented on the ballot shall disclose the specific purpose proposed for expenditure of the initial balance of the Trust Fund and the amount proposed for expenditure.

The Swain County Settlement Trust Fund is subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes.

The Swain County Settlement Trust Fund and the income therefrom shall not take the place of or be counted against any other State appropriations or program providing funds or disbursements to Swain County.

History.

2008-13, s. 3; 2013-381, s. 10.22; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1; 2019-133, s. 1; 2021-73, s. 2(b).

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor substituted “G.S. 163A-1592” for “G.S. 163-287” in subsection (f).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference in subsection (f).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-381, s. 10.22, effective January 1, 2014, deleted “on a date jointly agreed upon by the two boards, which may be the same day as any other referendum or election in the county, but may not otherwise be during the period beginning 30 days before and ending 30 days after the day of any other referendum or election to be conducted by the board of elections and already validly called or scheduled by law. The election shall be held” following “The election shall be held” in subsection (f). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2019-133, s. 1, effective October 1, 2019, rewrote the section.

Session Laws 2021-73, s. 2(b), effective July 2, 2021, added the second sentence in subsection (a).

§ 147-69.6A.
Lumbee Tribe of North Carolina Trust Fund.

The Lumbee Tribe of North Carolina Trust Fund is established as a special fund in the Office of the State Treasurer under the management of the Treasurer. The Fund shall consist of all funds received by the Lumbee Tribe of North Carolina for the sale or lease of natural resources from the property described as Parcel 1 in S.L. 2013-186 and the interest and other investment income earned by the Fund. Contributions to the Fund are irrevocable. Assets in the Fund may be disbursed only to the Lumbee Tribal Administration for the purposes provided in this section.

The State Treasurer shall disburse to the Lumbee Tribal Administration amounts requested by the Lumbee Tribal Administration for one of the following purposes if the stated conditions are met:

For the payment of property taxes on the described property, upon receipt of a property tax bill issued by the taxing unit.

For the reforestation of the described property under the supervision of a consulting forester registered pursuant to Chapter 89B of the General Statutes, upon receipt of an invoice for (i) the services of the consulting forester or (ii) the purchase and installation of seedlings or saplings.

The Lumbee Tribe of North Carolina Trust Fund is subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes.

The Lumbee Tribe of North Carolina Trust Fund and the income therefrom shall not take the place of or be counted against any other State appropriations or program providing funds or disbursements to the Lumbee Tribe of North Carolina.

History.

2019-162, s. 6.

§ 147-69.7.
Discharge of duties to funds.

The State Treasurer shall discharge his or her duties with respect to each fund or investment program held by the State Treasurer, including each of the funds, enumerated in

G.S. 147-69.2

as follows:

Solely in the interest of the intended beneficiaries of the fund, if any.

For the exclusive purpose of carrying out the purpose of the fund, including providing benefits to participants and beneficiaries, and paying reasonable expenses of administering the fund.

With the care, skill, and caution that a prudent investor would use after considering the purposes, distribution requirements, and other circumstances then prevailing.

Impartially, taking into account any differing interests of participants and beneficiaries.

Incurring only costs that are appropriate and reasonable.

In accordance with a good-faith interpretation of the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.2

and any other applicable law governing the fund.

In investing and managing assets of the fund pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the State Treasurer:

Shall consider the following circumstances:

General economic conditions.

The possible effect of inflation or deflation.

The role that each investment or course of action plays within the overall portfolio of the fund.

The expected total return from income and the appreciation of capital.

Needs for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation or appreciation of capital.

With respect to the Retirement Systems defined in G.S. 147-69.2(b)(8) and any other pension plans, the adequacy of funding for the Retirement Systems based on reasonable actuarial factors.

The purpose of the fund, if established.

Shall diversify the investments of the fund unless the State Treasurer reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, including applicable investment restrictions, it is clearly prudent not to do so.

Shall make a reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the investment and management of assets of the funds.

Shall invest only in those investments authorized by law consistent with the provisions of Article 6 of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes.

May consider benefits created by an investment in addition to investment return only if the State Treasurer determines that the investment providing these collateral benefits would be prudent even without collateral benefits.

Compliance by the State Treasurer with this section must be determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time of the Treasurer’s decision or action and not by hindsight.

The State Treasurer’s investment and management decisions must be evaluated not in isolation but in the context of the portfolio of the fund as a whole and as part of an overall investment strategy having risk and return objectives reasonably suited to the fund.

Notwithstanding any of the foregoing, the State Treasurer shall have no duty to assist or advise any official, board, commission, local government, other public authority, school administrative unit, local ABC board, community college of the State, or other person, trust, agency, institution, or entity in connection with any of the following decisions and directions with respect to any funds to be deposited with and invested by the State Treasurer:

The voluntary decision to deposit or withdraw funds in accordance with applicable law in one or more of the State Treasurer’s investment programs.

The voluntary direction as to the allocation of deposited funds in accordance with applicable law among the State Treasurer’s investment programs.

Any other decision or direction by which the depositor exercises control over assets deposited or to be deposited with the State Treasurer in accordance with applicable law.

History.

2009-283, s. 3; 2013-284, s. 1(e); 2013-398, s. 2; 2013-410, s. 27.5; 2016-55, s. 2.2; 2020-48, s. 1.18.

§ 147-69.8.
Annual report on new investment authority.

Whenever the General Assembly broadens the investment authority of the State Treasurer as to the General Fund, the Teachers’ and State Employees’ Retirement System, the Consolidated Judicial Retirement System, the Firefighters’ and Rescue Squad Workers’ Pension Fund, the Local Governmental Employees’ Retirement System, the Legislative Retirement System, the North Carolina National Guard Pension Fund, or any idle funds, the State Treasurer shall annually report in detail to the General Assembly the investments made under such new authority, including the returns on those investments, earnings, changes to value, and gains and losses in disposition of such investments. The report shall be made no later than the first six months of each calendar year, covering performance in the prior fiscal year. As to each type of new investment authority, the report shall be made for at least four years. To the extent the information required by this section is also required in the reports under

G.S. 147-69.12

, the State Treasurer may combine reports or make cross-reference to those reports.

History.

2009-283, s. 4; 2013-284, s. 1(f); 2016-55, s. 4.2.

§ 147-69.9.
Third-party audit of State Treasurer’s investments.

In addition to all other audits and reports required by the law, the State Treasurer shall prepare and issue, at the end of each fiscal year beginning with the 2015-2016 fiscal year, a set of consolidated stand-alone financial statements regarding investments authorized in

G.S. 147-69.1

and

G.S. 147-69.2

. These financial statements shall be audited by a commercial independent third-party audit firm selected and engaged by the State Treasurer. The audit firm’s report and the financial statement shall be provided to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the House of Representative Appropriations Committee, the Senate Appropriations/Base Budget Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division within six months after the closing of the reporting period.

The management discussion and analysis section of the report accompanying the financial statements shall include a discussion of the investment programs’ risk and returns compared to benchmarks, total management fees and incentives paid, and comparison to peer cost benchmarks.

History.

2016-55, s. 3.

§ 147-69.10.
Investment policies and performance reviews of Retirement Systems investment programs.

On at least a biennial basis, the State Treasurer shall present an investment policy statement to the Investment Advisory Committee for the Committee’s consultation. The investment policy statement must include descriptions of investment objectives and strategy, roles and responsibilities, permissible asset classes, asset allocation targets and ranges, risk management and compliance guidelines, and evaluation criteria necessary to measure investment performance.

At least once every four years, the State Treasurer shall engage a commercial independent expert firm, pursuant to G.S. 147-69.3(g), to evaluate the governance, operations, and investment practices of the State Treasurer in order to develop recommendations for improvement. The State Treasurer must consult with the Investment Advisory Committee to develop the scope of the evaluation. The report of the independent expert firm shall be provided to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee, the Senate Appropriations/Base Budget Committee, and the Fiscal Research Division within 30 days of receipt.

History.

2016-55, s. 3.

§ 147-69.11.
Ethics policies.

To ensure that the State Treasurer’s investment programs operate under a strong governance framework with rigorous internal controls and a high degree of operational transparency and are managed with the highest ethical and professional standards and in the most efficient and effective manner possible, the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Investment Advisory Committee, is authorized and required to adopt policies and procedures on the following topics:

Requiring that the Department of State Treasurer’s Investment Management Division adopt a code of ethics.

Requiring all employees of the Department who have responsibility for matters related to investments to be provided with training with respect to the discharge of their duties and responsibilities to the funds.

Governing gifts to employees of the Department who have responsibility for matters related to investments.

Imposing limitations on external investment managers’ use of placement agents and other persons that appear before the Department to ensure that these persons play only a proper role in investment opportunities.

As a component of the investment due diligence, negotiations, and contracting process, requiring an independent assessment of whether circumstances exist that create a material risk that professional judgement or actions regarding a potential investment arrangement’s recommendation, approval, or execution have been or will be unduly influenced by a direct or indirect personal interest.

History.

2016-55, s. 3.

§ 147-69.12.
Reporting on the State Treasurer’s investment programs.

No later than the tenth day of February, May, August, and November of each year, the State Treasurer shall report on all investments for which the State Treasurer is in any way responsible, including investments made from the Escheat Fund and return on investment as provided in

G.S. 147-69.2

A. This report shall be made for the Escheat Fund in lieu of the report required by

G.S. 147-69.8

. The State Treasurer’s quarterly report shall include each of the following:

A specific listing of all direct and indirect placement fees, asset fees, performance fees, and any other money management fees incurred by the State in the management of the Retirement Systems defined in

G.S. 147-69.2

(b)(8). In the event that the market value of any of subdivision (6c) or (7), sub-subdivision b. of subdivision (8), or subdivision (9) or (9a) of G.S. 147-69.2 increases during a fiscal year by an amount greater than three percent (3%) of the market value of all invested assets of the Retirement Systems as of the prior fiscal year end, then the quarterly report provided shall describe how that increase complies with the duties described in

G.S. 147-69.7

and the consequent expected impact on the risk profile of the Retirement Systems’ assets.

A specific listing of all investments made with certified green managers and companies and funds that support sustainable practices, including the names of the companies, managers, and funds, the amount invested, and the State’s return on investment.

For bank balances:

The State’s total bank balance with the State Treasurer, including the amount of cash on hand and money on deposit.

For each bank or other qualified depository utilized by the State Treasurer to hold cash balances, (i) the name of each depository and (ii) current quarter-end cash balances.

For the State Treasurer’s cash management programs:

Total assets.

Duration of investments.

Rate of return, including a comparison to an appropriate benchmark, if available.

For the Retirement Systems, as defined in G.S. 147-69.2(b)(8), reported separately for each asset class authorized by G.S. 147-69.2(b):

Total assets.

Rate of return, including a comparison to an appropriate benchmark, if available.

Percentage of the total assets that are invested in the asset class and the limitation, if any, on the percentage under G.S. 147-69.2(b).

For each investment program created under

G.S. 147-69.3

:

The financial condition of each investment program.

A full and complete statement of all moneys invested by virtue of the provisions of

G.S. 147-69.1

and G.S. 147-69.2.

The nature and character of the investments.

The revenues derived from the investments, net of fees and expenses.

The costs of administering, managing, and operating the investment programs, including the recapture of any investment commissions.

The location on the State Treasurer’s Web site where the public may find a statement of the investment policies for the revenues invested.

Any other information that may be helpful in understanding the State Treasurer’s investment policies, investment practices, and investment results.

Any other information requested by the House of Representatives and Senate Finance Committees.

The location on the State Treasurer’s Web site where the public may find a list of new commitments to external investment managers.

The location on the State Treasurer’s Web site where the public may find information on the use of placement agents by investment managers.

For all other investments with or on behalf of the State or any of its agencies or institutions:

The particular agency or institution, fund, rate of return, and duration of the investment.

The amount of deposit on all noninterest bearing accounts.

No later than the date set by

G.S. 147-69.9

for the submission of consolidated stand-alone financial statements, the State Treasurer shall report annually on the fees and performance of all externally and internally managed investments for the Retirement Systems defined in G.S. 147-69.2(b)(8). Externally managed investments shall be reported on the basis of each investment vehicle or investment manager, as applicable. Internally managed investments shall be reported on a portfolio-by-portfolio basis. The State Treasurer’s annual report shall include all of the following, as applicable, reported separately for each investment:

The name, commitment amount, statutory classification, and inception year.

Either a statement that the investment is managed internally by the staff of the State Treasurer or the names of the external investment manager and the investment vehicle for that investment.

Value of the investment.

Dollar amount of the management fees and incentive fees.

For investment-grade fixed income or public equity investments, the periodic net annualized time-weighted rate of return for that fiscal year and since inception, reported net of fees.

For all investments other than investment-grade fixed income or public equity investments, all of the following:

The net annualized internal rate of return and investment multiple since inception, reported net of fees.

The total cash contributions or other investments made by the State Treasurer.

The total distribution received by the State Treasurer with respect to that investment since inception, reported net of fees.

For any fund of funds investment vehicles, the aggregate management fees and incentive fees for the underlying investment managers or investment vehicles used by the external investment manager.

If any placement agent fees relating to the investment were directly or indirectly borne by the State Treasurer or Retirement Systems, a list of the amount and type of those fees.

The Treasurer shall report to the Governor annually the exact balance in the treasury to the credit of the State, with a summary of the receipts and payments of the treasury during the preceding fiscal year, and so far as practicable an account of the same down to the termination of the current calendar year.

The reports required by this section shall be delivered to the Joint Legislative Commission on Government Operations, chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees, chairs of the House of Representative and Senate Finance Committees, Fiscal Research Division, Governor, Council of State, and State Auditor. The reports shall also be made available for public review, including by posting on the State Treasurer’s Web site.A copy of a report on any State Treasurer investment program shall be sent to the official, institution, board, commission, or other agency investing in that program.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-125, s. 8, effective July 20, 2017.

History.

2016-55, s. 4.1(a), (b); 2017-102, s. 28.1(b); 2017-125, s. 8; 2021-180, s. 37.12(c).

§ 147-70.
To make short-term notes in emergencies.

Subject to the approval of the Governor and Council of State, the State Treasurer is authorized to make short-term notes for temporary emergencies, but such notes must only be made to provide for appropriations already made by the General Assembly.

History.

1915, c. 168, s. 3; C.S., s. 7685.

§ 147-71.
May demand and sue for money and property of State.

The Treasurer is authorized to demand, sue for, collect and receive all money and property of the State not held by some person under authority of law.

History.

1866, c. 46; Code, s. 3359; Rev., s. 5375; C.S., s. 7688.

§ 147-72.
Ex officio treasurer of State institutions; duties as such.

The Treasurer shall be ex officio the treasurer of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, of the North Carolina State College of Agriculture and Engineering, of the North Carolina School for the Deaf and Dumb at Morganton, of the North Carolina Institution for the Deaf and Dumb and the Blind at Raleigh, for the State hospitals (for the insane) at Raleigh, Morganton and Goldsboro and for the State’s prison. He may appoint deputies to act for him at Morganton and Goldsboro, and may pay such deputies reasonable compensation. He shall keep all accounts of the institutions, and shall pay out all moneys, upon the warrant of the respective chief officers or superintendents, countersigned by two members of the board of directors, managers, or trustees. He shall report to the respective boards at such times as they may call on him, showing the amount received on account of the institution, amount paid out, and amount on hand. He shall perform his duties as treasurer of these several institutions under such regulation as shall be prescribed in each case by their respective boards of managers, trustees or directors, with the approval of the Governor; and shall be responsible on his official bond for the faithful discharge of his duties as treasurer of each of the several institutions. As treasurer of such institutions he shall, annually, after the examination, verification, and cancellation of his vouchers, deposit the same with the respective institutions, and the superintendents thereof shall be responsible for their safekeeping.

History.

1879, c. 240, s. 2; 1881, c. 128; c. 211, s. 9; 1883, c. 156, s. 12; c. 405; Code, ss. 2235, 2251, 3723; 1895, c. 434; 1899, c. 1, s. 11; Rev., s. 5376; 1919, c. 314, s. 6; C.S., s. 7689; 1947, c. 781; 1997-261, s. 109.

Cross References.

As to schools for students with visual and hearing impairments, see

G.S. 115C-150.11

et seq.

§ 147-73.
Office of treasurer of each State institution abolished.

The office of treasurer of each of the several State institutions of which the State Treasurer is ex officio treasurer is hereby abolished.

History.

1929, c. 337, s. 3.

§ 147-74.
Office of State Treasurer declared office of deposit and disbursement.

The office of the State Treasurer is declared to be an office of deposit and disbursement and only such records and accounts as may be necessary to disclose the accountability of the State Treasurer shall be kept. The purpose of this section is to prevent duplication in account and record keeping and such accounts as may be necessary shall be prescribed by the Director of the Budget under the terms of the Executive Budget Act.

History.

1929, c. 337, s. 2.

§ 147-75.
Deputy to act for Treasurer.

The Treasurer may authorize a deputy to perform any duties pertaining to the office. The Treasurer may authorize a deputy to affix the Treasurer’s signature to any check, warrant or any other instrument the Treasurer is required to sign. The Treasurer shall be responsible for the conduct of his or her deputies.

History.

2016-55, s. 1.5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.5, effective January 31, 2017, substituted “sign” for “sign by use of the facsimile signature machine or device during the Treasurer’s absence or disability” in the second sentence and inserted “or her” in the last sentence.

§ 147-75.1.
Criminal record checks for the Department of State Treasurer.

The Department of State Treasurer may obtain from the State and National Repositories of Criminal Histories or from any other lawful source the criminal history of any of the following individuals:

A current or prospective permanent or temporary employee of the Department of State Treasurer.

A contractor with the Department of State Treasurer.

An employee or agent of a contractor with the Department of State Treasurer who is performing or will perform work for the Department of State Treasurer.

A volunteer of the Department of State Treasurer.

Any other individual otherwise engaged by the Department of State Treasurer who will have access to health or financial information or data maintained by the Department of State Treasurer that is confidential or otherwise nonpublic.

The Department of State Treasurer may deny employment to or dismiss any individual identified under subdivisions (1), (2), (4), and (5) of subsection (a) of this section who refuses to consent to a criminal history record check or to the use of fingerprints or other identifying information required by the State or National Repositories of Criminal Histories. Any refusal shall constitute just cause for the employment denial or the dismissal from employment.

The Department of State Treasurer may extend a conditional offer of employment pending the results of a criminal history record check authorized by this section.

History.

2020-29, s. 9.

§ 147-76.
Liability for false entries in his books.

If the Treasurer of the State shall wittingly or falsely make, or cause to be made, any false entry or charge in any book by him as Treasurer, or shall wittingly or falsely form, or procure to be formed, any statement of the treasury, to be by him laid before the Governor, the General Assembly, or any committee thereof, or to be by him used in any settlement which he is required to make with intent, in any of said instances, to defraud the State or any person, such Treasurer shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

R.C., c. 34, s. 68; Code, s. 1119; Rev., s. 3606; C.S., s. 7691; 1983, c. 913, s. 53; 1993, c. 539, s. 1055; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 147-76.1.
Require deposit into the State treasury of funds received by the State.

Definition. — For purposes of this section, the term “cash gift or donation” means any funds provided, without valuable consideration, to the State, for use by the State, or for the benefit of the State.

Requirement. — Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, all funds received by the State, including cash gifts and donations, shall be deposited into the State treasury. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as exempting from the requirement set forth in this subsection funds received by a State officer or employee acting on behalf of the State.

Terms Binding. — Except as otherwise provided by subsection (b) of this section, the terms of an instrument evidencing a cash gift or donation are a binding obligation of the State. Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede, or authorize a deviation from the terms of an instrument evidencing a gift or donation setting forth the purpose for which the funds may be used.

History.

2019-250, s. 5.7(a).

§ 147-77.
Daily deposit of funds to credit of Treasurer.

All funds belonging to the State of North Carolina, in the hands of any head of any department of the State which collects revenue for the State in any form whatsoever, and every institution, agency, officer, employee, or representative of the State or any agency, department, division or commission thereof, except officers and the clerks of the Supreme Court and Court of Appeals, collecting or receiving any funds or money belonging to the State of North Carolina, shall daily deposit the same in some bank, or trust company, selected or designated by the State Treasurer, in the name of the State Treasurer, at noon, or as near thereto as may be, and shall report the same daily to the Treasurer. The State Treasurer may authorize exemptions from the provisions of this section so long as funds are deposited and reported pursuant to the provisions of this section at least once a week and, in addition, so long as funds are deposited and reported pursuant to the provisions of this section whenever as much as five thousand dollars ($5,000) has been collected and received. Each State agency that has custody of funds less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall provide adequate safekeeping of such funds. The Treasurer may refund the amount of any bad checks which have been returned to the department by the Treasurer when the same have not been collected after 30 days’ trial.

History.

1925, c. 128, s. 1; 1945, c. 159; 1969, c. 44, s. 77; 1985, c. 708; 2015-164, s. 3(b).

Cross References.

As to daily deposits by community colleges, see

G.S. 115D-58.9

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-164, s. 3(b), effective October 1, 2015, rewrote the section.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

“Enterprise funds”

maintained by the Division of Vocational Rehabilitation Services and “student activity funds” maintained by the Schools for the Deaf are required to be deposited with the State Treasurer pursuant to

G.S. 147-77

. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Phillip J. Kirk, Jr., Secretary, Department of Human Resources, 56 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 10 (1986).

Funds donated to Lenox Baker Children’s Hospital

are required to be deposited with the State Treasurer unless the conditions or terms of the gift provide to the contrary, or unless otherwise provided by law. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Richard J. Vinegar, Chairman Board of Directors of Lenox Baker Children’s Hospital, 56 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 31 (1986).

Any gift in trust where the terms contraindicate investment or deposit

with the State Treasurer (for example where the terms of the gift provide for a private trustee) would be exempt from the operation of the cash management policy. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Phillip J. Kirk, Jr., Secretary, Department of Human Resources, 56 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 10 (1986).

§ 147-78.
Treasurer to select depositories.

The State Treasurer is hereby authorized and empowered to select and designate, wherever necessary, in this State some bank or banks, savings and loan association or associations, or trust company as an official depository of the State.

History.

1925, c. 128, s. 2; 1979, c. 637, s. 4; 1983, c. 158, s. 5.

§ 147-78.1.
Good faith deposits; use of master trust.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Treasurer is authorized to select a bank or trust company as master trustee to hold cash or securities to be pledged to the State when deposited with the State Treasurer pursuant to statute or at the request of another State agency. Securities may be held by the master trustee in any form that, in fact, perfects the security interest of the State in the securities. The State Treasurer shall contractually establish the manner in which the master trust shall operate. The master trustee may charge reasonable fees for services rendered to each person who deposits the cash or securities with the State.

History.

1985, c. 496, s. 1; 2016-55, s. 1.6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-55, s. 1.6, effective January 31, 2017, substituted “the State Treasurer” for “him” in the first sentence and “contractually” for “by rule or regulation” in the third sentence.

§ 147-79.
Deposits to be secured; reports of depositories.

The amount of funds deposited by the State Treasurer in an official depository shall be adequately secured by deposit insurance, surety bonds, letters of credit issued by a Federal Home Loan Bank, or investment securities of such nature, in such amounts, and in such manner, as may be prescribed by rule or regulation of the State Treasurer with the approval of the Governor and Council of State. No security is required for the protection of funds remitted to and received by a bank or trust company designated by the State Treasurer under

G.S. 142-1

and acting as paying agent for the payment of the principal of or interest on bonds or notes of the State.

Each official depository having deposits required to be secured by subsection (a) of this section may be required to report to the State Treasurer on January 1 and July 1 of each year (or such other dates as he may prescribe) a list of all surety bonds or investment securities securing such deposits. If the State Treasurer finds at any time that any funds of the State are not properly secured, he shall so notify the depository. Upon such notification, the depository shall comply with the applicable law or regulations forthwith.

Violation of the provisions of this section shall be a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1933, c. 461, ss. 1, 11/2; 1979, c. 637, s. 3; 1993, c. 539, s. 1056; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2016-108, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2016-108, s. 4, effective July 22, 2016, in subsection (a), inserted “letters of credit issued by a Federal Home Loan Bank.”

Legal Periodicals.

For review of this section, see 11 N.C.L. Rev. 201 (1933).

§ 147-80.
Deposit in other banks unlawful; liability.

It shall be unlawful for any funds of the State to be deposited by any person, institution, or department or agency in any place or bank or trust company, other than those so selected and designated as official depositories of the State of North Carolina by the State Treasurer, and any person so offending or aiding and abetting in such offense shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor and any person so offending or aiding and abetting in such offense shall also immediately become civilly liable to the State of North Carolina in the amount of the money or funds unlawfully deposited, and, at the instance of the State Treasurer, or at the instance of the Governor, the Attorney General shall forthwith institute the civil action in the name of the State of North Carolina against such person or persons, either in the courts of Wake County, according to their respective jurisdiction, or in the county in which said unlawful deposit has been made, according to the selection made by the officer requesting the institution of such action, for the purpose of recovering the amount of the money so unlawfully deposited, with interest thereon at six percent (6%) per annum, and for the cost of said action, and the court in which said action is tried may also tax, as a part of the cost in said action, to the use of the State of North Carolina, a sum sufficient to reimburse the State of North Carolina for all expense incidental to or connected with the preparation and prosecution of such action.

History.

1925, c. 128, s. 3; 1993, c. 539, s. 1057; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 147-81.
Number of depositories; contract.

The State Treasurer is authorized and empowered to select as many depositories in one place and in the State as may appear to him to be necessary and convenient for the various officers, representatives and employees of the State, to comply with the purposes of

G.S. 147-77

, 147-78, 147-80, 147-81, 147-82, 147-83 and 147-84, and may make such contracts with said depositories for the payment of interest on average daily or monthly balances as may appear advantageous to the State in the opinion of such Treasurer and the Governor.

History.

1925, c. 128, s. 4.

§ 147-82.
Accounts of funds kept separate.

In order to preserve and keep them separate, all funds that are now required by law to be kept separate or to be separately administered, both by State departments, institutions, commissions, and other agencies or divisions of the State which collect or receive funds belonging to the State, or funds handled or maintained as trust funds in any form by such department, division or institution shall be evidenced in daily reports by distribution sheets, which shall reflect and show an exact copy of the accounts, showing the distribution of said money kept by such collecting departments, institutions and agencies, and the same shall be entered in the records of the office of the State Treasurer, so as to keep and maintain in the office where the same is first collected or received the same account thereof, and of the distribution thereof, the same records and accounts as are kept in the office of the State Treasurer relating thereto.

History.

1925, c. 128, s. 5.